California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Update on the Transition of Providers to the CCR Program Models. With a focus on changes over time, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include status updates on the transition of providers to the short-term residential therapeutic program (STRTP), resource family approval (RFA), therapeutic foster care, intensive services foster care, and temporary shelter care facilities program models. Data reporting under this section shall include all of the following:

(a) The number of applications for STRTP and foster family agency (FFA) licensure, placement capacity of STRTPs, and updates on the outcomes of licensure requests.

(b) (1) The average number of days from initial
 application for a provisional STRTP license to issuance of the license.

(2) The number of provisional and permanent STRTP and FFA licenses issued, the number of permanent STRTP and FFA licenses under compliance review, and the number of provisional STRTP licenses that will expire prior to achieving full licensure.

(c) The number of active licenses for STRTPs and FFAs, the placement capacities of each, and the percentage of each that have achieved accreditation.

(d) (1) By county, the number of group homes for which extensions have been requested by probation or child welfare agencies, and the number approved by the department.

(2) The primary reasons group home license extensions are necessary.

(e) The number and geographic distribution of children remaining in group homes and the status of their transition plans.

(f) The number of FFAs and group homes not pursuing a license under CCR standards, the placement capacity of those providers, and the number of children placed with those providers.

(g) (1) The number and capacity, as data becomes available, of in-home, intensive service homes available as an alternative to congregate care placement, including, but not limited to, therapeutic foster care and intensive services foster care.

(2) To the extent that information described in this subdivision is not available to be shared, the counties and entities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16523.5 shall describe the
 limitations and explore and present options for remedying the lack of available information. As part of this process, meetings may be held with stakeholders, county representatives, legislative staff, and the Department of Finance to identify acceptable solutions, alternatives, or proxies.

(h) The number and identification of counties with licensed temporary shelter care facilities.

(i) The number of reports received by the department from county placing agencies regarding youth requiring an STRTP-level of care in which the county either is unable to secure a placement into an STRTP or has received notice of a requested placement change from the STRTP before treatment is complete, and data that include the ages, gender identity, and service needs of the youth, including final disposition of those cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.52.

Update on Capacity to Provide Mental Health Services. With a focus on changes over time, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include status updates on the capacity of STRTPs and FFAs to provide mental health services. Data reporting under this section shall include all of the following:

(a) (1) By county, the number of STRTPs requesting mental health program approval and the outcomes of approval requests.

(2) By county, the average number of days from application for mental health program approval to issuance of mental health program approval.

(3) By county, the average number of days from application
 of Medi-Cal site visit to completion of site visit and certification.

(b) (1) The number of STRTPs with a mental health program approval, Medi-Cal certification, and specialty mental health contracts to provide specialty mental health services, and the licensed capacity of those providers.

(2) The number of FFAs with Medi-Cal certification and mental health contracts that allow for the provision of services beyond the types required by regulation.

(c) The number of denied mental health program approvals for STRTPS, the number of denied Medi-Cal certification for STRTPs and FFAs, and the number of STRTPs and FFAs not awarded a mental health contract.

(d) The number of FFAs approved to deliver therapeutic foster care, the capacity of
 the homes, the number of foster parents who have been trained and approved to provide therapeutic foster care, and the geographic service areas served.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.53.

Tracking Child Outcomes over Time.

(a) With a focus on changes over time, and to the extent data are available, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include status updates on all of the following child outcome measures:

(1) The number and percent of children in out-of-home care, stratified by placement type, LOCP, and whether the supervising department is the county child welfare or probation agency.

(2) The average number of placements per child, and the average length of stay per placement episode by placement type.

(3) The proportion of placements that
 constitute a move to a less restrictive setting, and the proportion of placements that constitute a move to a permanent home.

(4) The number and percent of children in residential placement without an identified home-based caregiver for transition, stratified by county.

(5) Information on the evaluation of the LOCP tool and changes that may result from evaluation findings.

(6) Ongoing information on state and county efforts to ensure consistent and valid statewide outcomes of the new LOCP tool for children across counties.

(7) (A) By county, the number and percent of children entering intensive services foster care placements and therapeutic foster care specialty mental health services.

(B) As they become available, data on which other services, including the broader array of behavioral health services, that children in these placements are determined to require, and the status of their service access and utilization rates.

(8) As information becomes available, summarized results from the youth satisfaction survey.

(9) (A) By county, the number and percentage of children in foster care receiving specialty mental health services on a quarterly or monthly basis, stratified by service type, county, placement type, and LOCP.

(B) As data become available, services shall be further delineated by subcomponents, including assessment plan development, collateral contacts, rehabilitation, and therapy.

(10) (A) By county, the number and percentage of children in foster care receiving mental health services on a quarterly or monthly basis under the Medi-Cal managed care and fee-for-service systems, stratified by service type, county, placement type, and LOCP.

(B) As data become available, services shall be further delineated by subcomponents, including assessment plan development, collateral contacts, rehabilitation, and therapy.

(11) For all children in foster care who screened positive for referral for mental health services assessment, the number of days from the date of placement and from the date of screening to the receipt of a specialty mental health service assessment and ongoing services pursuant to a medical necessity determination, stratified by county mental health plan and
 provider.

(12) By county, the number and disposition of service complaints regarding specialty and nonspecialty mental health service delivery for foster youth.

(13) The number and percentage of children with an open child welfare case and foster care placement who receive a required mental health screen and, when screened as positive, who receive a referral and mental health services.

(14) By county, the number of youth who obtained legal permanency during each month or quarter.

(b) To the extent that information described in this section is not available to be shared, the counties and entities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16523.5 shall describe the limitations and explore and present options for remedying the lack of available information. As
 part of this process, meetings may be held with stakeholders, county representatives, legislative staff, and the Department of Finance to identify acceptable solutions, alternatives, or proxies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.54.

Update on CCR-Related Costs and Savings. Once available, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include status updates on CCR-related costs and savings, including all of the following:

(a) By county, ongoing county costs and savings related to CCR implementation.

(b) Other services and supplemental payments for which counties use reinvested CCR-related savings, including funding to match Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) federal funding and funding for FFA services-only rates.

(c) The extent to which the new STRTP and FFA rates are adequate to compensate providers for meeting the new service
 requirements of CCR.

(d) The extent to which each of the LOCP rate levels provides adequate resources to resource families caring for children at all assessed levels of need.

(e) A description of each county’s changes to specialized care increment (SCI) programs, if any, including any changes in benefit levels and suspensions or terminations of SCI programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.55.

Child and Family Teams (CFT) and Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS) Implementation.

(a) The updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include a status update on the utilization of the CANS assessment.

(1) By county, the number and percentage of children in foster care receiving CFT meetings and CANS assessments.

(2) As data become available, data by county on the average frequency of meetings and assessments and the overall CANS scoring outcomes and trends over time.

(3) As it becomes available, data by county of the number of CANS assessments and who
 conducted the assessments.

(4) As it becomes available, data by county of the percentage of CANS assessments that are conducted at the required minimum of three months for behavioral health or the six-month minimum by the child welfare agency.

(b) To the extent that information described in this section is not available to be shared, the counties and entities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16523.5 shall describe the limitations and explore and present options for remedying the lack of available information. As part of this process, meetings may be held with stakeholders, county representatives, legislative staff, and the Department of Finance to identify acceptable solutions, alternatives, or proxies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.56.

Resource Families.

(a) The updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include a status update on the implementation of the resource family approval process.

(1) Data on the progress of RFA implementation, including the number of RFA applications and approvals and the average number of days for an application to be approved or disapproved over time, separated by relatives and nonrelatives.

(2) The information described in paragraph (1) as applied to caregivers with a placement prior to approval, including the number of applications taking longer than 90 days and the number of applications taking longer than 180 days.

(3) By county, the number of newly approved resource family homes, stratified by relative and community homes.

(4) As data becomes available, data by county of the number of family homes no longer available for placement, stratified by families who have moved to legal permanency, including guardianship and adoption.

(5) By county, the number of families who have received additional supports or services through the Foster Parent Recruitment, Retention, and Support Funding Opportunity.

(b) To the extent that information described in this section is not available to be shared, the counties and entities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16523.5 shall describe the limitations and explore and present options for remedying the lack of available information. As
 part of this process, meetings may be held with stakeholders, county representatives, legislative staff, and the Department of Finance to identify acceptable solutions, alternatives, or proxies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.57.

Supporting the Transitions of Child Welfare Youth from Group Homes and Reduced Use of Congregate Care. Pursuant to the extensions granted in subdivision (e) of Section 11462.04, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include information and aggregate data, as it becomes available, of the following, as it relates to children placed by child welfare:

(a) By county, the family finding activities attempted or underway, or other activities to connect the child to caring adults outside of the congregate care setting.

(b) Identification of the counties that have any existing or planned contracts, or efforts to directly provide or contract for intensive child specific recruitment services.

(c) Identification of counties with any existing or planned specialty mental health services targeted to address the mental health service needs of a foster child transitioning from congregate care to permanency or other family-based care setting, and a summary of any gaps that remain.

(d) The number of children that successfully achieved permanency following receipt of services described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.58.

System Changes. Pursuant to existing reporting requirements on the replacement statewide child welfare information system, Child Welfare Services – California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES), the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include a status update on the automation changes to the
 existing statewide child welfare information system, Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) and licensing systems needed to support CCR implementation, including, but not limited to, support for Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS), the RFA process, LOCP, and other programmatic elements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 76.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.59.

Update on County Recruitment and Retention Efforts. As data are available, the updates described in Section 16523.5 shall include status updates on the recruitment and retention of new resource families, including, but not limited to, the number of new family-based providers separated by relatives and nonrelative caregivers, exits from care due to achieving legal permanency, and the supports and services available to family-based caregivers to support family stability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.1. Child Welfare Services Program Improvement Fund [16524. - 16524.5.]

16524.

(a) The Child Welfare Services Program Improvement Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. The fund shall consist of donated grants, gifts, or bequests made to the state from private sources, and the moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to enhance the state’s ability to provide a comprehensive system of supports that promote positive outcomes for children and families.

(b) To the extent possible, the department shall use moneys in the fund as a match to obtain federal participation in the cost of eligible activities.

(c) Moneys made available through the Child Welfare Services Program Improvement Fund shall be used to augment federal, state, or county funds made available for the child welfare services program.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys in the Child Welfare Services Program Improvement Fund shall provide for activities including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Providing mandated training statewide for all child welfare services social workers.

(2) Standardizing training so that all foster parents and relative caregivers in the state receive the same level and quality of training.

(3) Expediting the implementation of evidence-based practices, as recommended in the Child Welfare Services (CWS) Redesign.

(4) Supporting the state’s ability to achieve improved outcomes for children and families consistent with the terms of the State of California Program Improvement Plan (PIP) for the Child Welfare Services Program.

(5) Supporting technical assistance efforts for counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.5.

(a) The State Department of Social Services may fund the various activities authorized pursuant to Section 16524 by means of grants rather than contracts. The grants shall not be subject to the review specified in Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) The department may renew grants for the various activities authorized pursuant to Section 16524 that exceed three years in duration if the grant is reviewed annually and the grantee is found to be satisfactorily meeting the grant objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (AB 2129)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.2. Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program [16524.6. - 16524.11.]

16524.6.

The Legislature finds and declares that in order to reduce the vulnerability of all children in California communities to incidents of commercial sexual exploitation, and adequately serve children who have been sexually exploited, it is necessary that counties develop and utilize a multidisciplinary team approach to early identification, prevention education, case management, service planning, and provision of services, and that counties develop and utilize interagency protocols to ensure services are provided as needed to this population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 558, Sec. 5.   (AB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.7.

(a) (1) There is hereby established the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program. This program shall be administered by the State Department of Social Services.

(2) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop an allocation methodology to distribute funding for the program. Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be utilized to cover expenditures related to the costs of implementing the program, prevention and intervention services, and training related to children who are, or may become, victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(3) (A) Funds shall be provided to counties that elect to participate in the program for the provision of training to county children’s services workers to identify, intervene, and provide case management services to children who are victims of commercial sexual exploitation and trafficking, as applicable, and to foster caregivers for the prevention and identification of potential victims.

(B) The department shall contract to provide training for county
 workers and foster caregivers. Training shall be selected and contracted for in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, county children’s services representatives, and other stakeholders. The department shall consult and collaborate with the California Community Colleges Chancellor’s Office to provide training for foster parents of licensed foster family homes.

(4) Funds provided to the counties electing to participate in the program shall be used for prevention activities, which includes training county workers, intervention activities, and services to children who are victims, or at risk of becoming victims, of commercial sexual exploitation. These activities and services may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Educating foster children to help recognize and help avoid commercial sexual exploitation. Counties may target educational activities to foster children who are at higher risk of commercial sexual exploitation.

(B) Engaging survivors of commercial sexual exploitation to do all of the following:

(i) Provide support to county staff who serve children who are victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(ii) Participate in activities that may include education, training, and technical assistance.

(iii) Serve as advocates for and perform outreach and support to children who are victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(C) Consulting and coordinating with homeless youth shelters and other service providers who work with children who are disproportionately at risk of, or involved in, commercial sexual exploitation, including, but not limited to, lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender youth organizations, regarding outreach and support to children who are victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(D) Hiring county staff trained and specialized to work with children who are victims of commercial sexual exploitation to support victims and their caregivers, and to provide case management to support interagency and cross-departmental response.

(E) Providing supplemental foster care rates for placement of child victims of
 commercial sexual exploitation adjudged to be within the definition of Section 300, to foster homes, relatives, foster family agency certified homes, or other specialized placements for the increased care and supervision needs of the victim in accordance with Section 11460.

(b) Funds allocated for the program shall not supplant funds for existing programs.

(c) (1) In order to ensure timely access to services to which commercially sexually exploited children are entitled as dependents in foster care, in participating counties, county agency representatives from mental health, probation, public health, and substance abuse disorders shall participate in the case planning and assist in linking commercially sexually exploited children to services that serve
 children who are in the child welfare system and that are identified in the child’s case plan and may include other stakeholders as determined by the county.

(2) The entities described in paragraph (1) shall provide input to the child welfare services agency regarding the services and supports needed for these children to support treatment needs and aid in their recovery and may assist in linking these children to services that are consistent with their county plans submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) (1) A county electing to receive funding from the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program pursuant to this chapter shall submit a plan describing how the county intends to utilize the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (a).

(2) (A) The county shall submit a plan to the department pursuant to a process developed by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association. The plan shall include documentation indicating the county’s collaboration with county partner agencies, educational entities, and children-focused entities, which shall include the formation of a multidisciplinary team to serve children pursuant to this chapter.

(B) A multidisciplinary team serving a child pursuant to this chapter shall include, but is not limited to, appropriate staff from the county child welfare, probation, mental health, substance abuse disorder, and public health
 departments. Staff from a local provider of services to this population, local education agencies, and local law enforcement, and survivors of commercial sexual exploitation and trafficking may be included on the team.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 558, Sec. 6.   (AB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.8.

(a) (1) Each county electing to receive funds from the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program pursuant to this chapter shall develop an interagency protocol to be utilized in serving sexually exploited children. The county protocol shall be developed by a team led by a representative of the county human services department and shall include representatives from each of the following agencies:

(A) The county probation department.

(B) The county mental health department.

(C) The county public health department.

(D) The juvenile court in the county.

(E) The county office of education.

(F) The county sheriff’s department.

(2) The team may include, but shall not be limited to, representatives from local education agencies, local law enforcement, survivors of sexual exploitation, and other providers as necessary.

(b) At a minimum, the interagency protocol shall address the provision of services to children who have been sexually exploited and are within the definition of Section 300, including, but not limited to, the use of a multidisciplinary team approach to provide coordinated case management,
 service planning, and services to these children.

(c) Counties that developed a protocol prior to the inclusion of county offices of education and county sheriff’s departments as required partners pursuant to this section may, but are not required to, revise protocols to reflect input by these entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 558, Sec. 7.   (AB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.9.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall ensure that the statewide child welfare information system is capable of collecting data concerning children who are commercially sexually exploited, including children who are referred to the child abuse hotline and children currently served by county child welfare and probation departments who are subsequently identified as victims of commercial sexual exploitation.

(b) The department shall disseminate any
 necessary instructions on data entry to the county child welfare and probation department staff.

(c) The department shall implement this section no later than June 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 77.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.10.

The State Department of Social Services, no later than April 1, 2017, shall provide the following information to the Legislature regarding the implementation of this chapter:

(a) The participating counties.

(b) The number of victims served by each county.

(c) The types of services provided.

(d) Innovative strategies relating to collaboration with children, child service providers, and survivors of commercial sexual exploitation regarding prevention, training, and services.

(e) The identification of further barriers and challenges to preventing and serving commercially sexually exploited children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 29, Sec. 79.   (SB 855)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Operative January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 16524.11.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.11.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 29, Sec. 79.   (SB 855)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (January 1, 2015) for Chapter 5.2, commencing with Section 16524.6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.3. Services for Children Who Are Exposed to Alcohol or Drugs or Who Are HIV Positive [16525. - 16525.30.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [16525. - 16525.5.]

16525.

The definitions in this article shall control the interpretation of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.1.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.2.

“Eligible child” means any child who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) or (b), and subdivision (c).

(a) Any child who has a medically diagnosed condition or symptoms resulting from, or suspected as resulting from, substance abuse by the mother.

(b) Any child who is HIV positive.

(c) Any child who meets the requirements of either subdivision (a) or (b) and who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The child is a dependent child of the court.

(2) The child is aged newborn to 36 months. The maximum age prescribed by this paragraph shall be increased to 60 months if funds are available within the existing appropriation for counties maintaining a program for a minimum of three years, or, for other counties, if funds are available pursuant to the California Children and Families Program (Division 108 (commencing with Section 130100) of the Health and Safety Code) to provide services to children who are aged between 36 and 60 months.

(3) The child is the child of a resident of a participating county pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.3.

“HIV” means human immunodeficiency virus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.4.

“HIV positive” means a condition of being medically diagnosed as infected with HIV.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.5.

“Specialized in-home health care” means, but is not limited to, those services identified by the child’s primary physician as appropriately administered by a foster parent, trained by health care professionals pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child to his or her home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Options for Recovery Program [16525.10. - 16525.30.]

16525.10.

(a) In order to promote the development of placements that will allow children to move into more homelike environments, counties may establish an “Options for Recovery” program.

(b) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the “Options for Recovery” services shall be funded with a 30 percent nonfederal county share consistent with the normal sharing ratio for child welfare services. This county share may be provided with county general funds, or other sources of funds which are unrestricted and are eligible for this use as provided by the funding source. The source of the county share shall meet all applicable state and federal requirements and provide counties with maximum
 flexibility.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 141.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.11.

Each participating county shall recruit foster families that shall be licensed as foster family homes and trained to care for children who are alcohol- or drug-exposed or who test HIV positive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.13.

(a) A participating county shall provide special training to recruited foster parents to care for eligible children and shall certify that the training has been provided.

(b) Participating counties may provide the same special training to relative caretakers of project-eligible children, if classroom space permits and the cost of providing the training does not exceed the county’s allocation for project training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.14.

When a child is identified by a physician, medical team, county social worker, or placement source as a child who may be eligible for services under this chapter, the county shall determine if the child is eligible for placement pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.15.

(a) A participating county shall select a specialized foster family home for the child within the county in which the child’s eligibility is established.

(b) If an eligible child’s out-of-home placement changes from one participating county to another participating county, the child shall remain eligible for services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 52.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.17.

(a) Participating counties shall prepare a child welfare services case plan pursuant to regulations adopted by the department and arrange nonmedical support services, including respite care for specially trained foster parents and relative caretakers.

(b) Each participating county shall monitor the foster home in accordance with applicable regulations governing the foster care and child welfare services programs authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 3 and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.20.

(a) The Legislature encourages participating counties to design and implement a range of respite options for specially trained foster parents and relative caretakers, from foster parent to foster parent cooperatives to more formal arrangements for services from subcontractors.

(b) No one who resides in the home with the eligible child shall receive payment for providing respite services for the eligible child or for any other child living in the home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.25.

The counties participating pursuant to this section shall do both of the following:

(a) Maintain existing programs and standards for a specialized foster home recruitment and training project that will establish foster care placements to care for eligible children.

(b) Coordinate sources of funding and services available to eligible children in order to maximize the social services provided to these children and avoid duplication of programs and funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 142.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.26.

A participating county may contract for the provision of services under this chapter on a sole source basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.27.

(a) Each participating county shall submit written progress reports as required by the department.

(b) The progress report required by subdivision (a) shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following data:

(1) An estimate of the number of children adjudicated dependents of the juvenile court under Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 who are eligible children.

(2) The number of eligible children who are in all of the following:

(A) Foster family homes.

(B) Group homes.

(C) Homes of relative caretakers.

(D) Certified foster family homes.

(3) The number of eligible children who are in specialized foster care placements during and at the termination of the demonstration project.

(4) The cost of providing training to foster parents in the care of eligible children.

(5) The cost of providing specialized care for eligible children.

(6) The cost of providing respite care services and the number of respite care hours each family received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 53.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.29.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent children who are alcohol- or drug-exposed or HIV positive who have adoption as a case plan goal from receiving services under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.30.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, Sections 1250, 1251, 1254, 1270, 1501, 1502, 1505, 1507, 1521, 1530.6, and 11002, subdivision (c) of Section 1550, and subdivision (a) of Section 11154 of the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 2052, 2725, 2732, and 2795 of the Business and Professions Code, subdivisions (b) and (c) shall control the placement of a child pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A county may place children who are alcohol- or drug-exposed or HIV positive in foster family homes pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) If a county makes a placement pursuant to subdivision (b), a foster parent trained by health care professionals pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child may provide specialized in-home health care to that foster child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.4. Family Urgent Response System for Caregivers and Children or Youth [16526. - 16530.]

16526.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Caregiver” means a person responsible for meeting the daily care needs of a current or former foster child or youth, and who is entrusted to provide a loving and supportive environment for the child or youth to promote their healing from trauma.

(b) “Current or former foster child or youth” includes a child or youth who is
 adjudicated under Section 300, 601, or 602 and is served by a county child welfare agency or probation department, a child or youth who has exited foster care for any reason, including, but not limited to, reunification, guardianship, adoption, or emancipation, a child or youth who is the subject of a voluntary placement agreement as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 11400, a child or youth who is placed in foster care and is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 300, and a child or youth placed in California pursuant to the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children. A current or former foster child or youth shall be eligible for services under this chapter until they attain 21 years of age.

(c) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.
